Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.220

Returns to commission.

Every dealer, handler, and processor shall at such times as the commission may by rule or regulation require, file with the commission a return under oath on forms to be prescribed and furnished by the commission, stating the quantity of soft tree fruits handled, shipped, or processed by him or her during the period or periods of time prescribed by the commission. Such return shall contain such further information as may be necessary to carry out the objects and purposes of this chapter.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6042; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.220. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 21; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-30.]